Washington statutes.
RCW 18.350.020

Use of title—Certification or registration required.

(1) No person may practice or represent himself or herself as a certified dental anesthesia assistant by use of any title or description without being certified by the commission as having met the standards established for certification under this chapter.

(2) A certified dental anesthesia assistant may not practice or represent himself or herself as a registered dental assistant without being registered by the commission as having met the standards for registration under chapter 18.260 RCW.

[ 2012 c 23 s 2.]